Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 9 Community Obligations and Banking Offenses

19-9-1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Lending institution” includes any regulated institution and any person who or that makes loans of money or negotiates the lending of money for another in any state or jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 8.

19-9-2.
Escrow accounts — Interest.

Every mortgagee holding funds of a mortgagor in escrow for the payment of taxes and insurance premiums with respect to mortgaged property located in this state shall pay or credit interest on those funds at a rate equal to the rate paid to the mortgagee on its regular savings account, if offered, and otherwise at a rate not less than the prevailing market rate of interest for regular savings accounts offered by local financial institutions as determined by the director, said determination to be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this provision and thereafter annually on the first business day of the year. Said credit of interest shall accrue on the daily balance and be made annually on December 31. If the mortgage debt is paid prior to December 31 in any year, the interest to the date of payment shall be paid to the mortgagor. The provision of this section shall apply only with respect to mortgages on owner-occupied residential property consisting of not more than four (4) living units. The provisions of this section shall not be waived. No mortgagee holding the mortgagor’s funds in escrow for the payment of taxes shall also charge an annual “tax service fee” or other annual fee for ascertaining whether or not the real estate taxes have in fact been paid. Any mortgagee violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

Mortgages insured or guaranteed by the Farmer’s Home Loan Administration, Federal Housing Administration, or the Veterans’ Administration, or a private mortgage insurer licensed to do business in the state of Rhode Island or made pursuant to the provisions of chapter 55 of title 42 shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall adopt any regulations that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47; P.L. 2008, ch. 238, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 309, § 2.

19-9-2.1.
Mortgage billing — Payment allocation.

All monthly billing by mortgagees to mortgagors must show the allocation of the mortgagor’s prior monthly payment to principal, interest, and escrow, if applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 636, § 1.

19-9-3.
Mortgages — Appraisal fees.

Every lending institution that accepts an application for a mortgage loan that requires the payment of an appraisal fee, shall, prior to the payment of the appraisal fee, inform the applicant that if the mortgage is not approved, the appraisal fee may not be refunded to the customer.

Every lending institution that accepts an application for a mortgage loan and which, at the applicant’s expense, engages a real estate appraiser to conduct an appraisal of the subject real estate shall, upon written request, provide the applicant with a copy of the appraisal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-3.1.
Mortgage loan appraisers — Relationship with lending institution.

Every lending institution, that accepts an application for any residential mortgage loan or any commercial mortgage loan that requires an appraisal in order to process the loan, is not permitted to use an appraisal company that is either owned by or has directors, stockholders, or employees of that lending institution.

Each lending institution doing business in the state pursuant to a charter or license issued under this title shall, upon request of the director of business regulation, or the director’s designee, disclose to the director those appraisal companies with which the lending institution has an ownership interest or which have directors, stockholders, or employees of the lending institution.

Any lending institution that maintains Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) or National Credit Union Administration (NCUA) insurance protection for its deposits is exempt from the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 128, § 5.

19-9-4.
Credit needs of local communities.

Each regulated institution, as defined in this chapter, to which the Community Reinvestment Act of 1977, 12 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq., and as subsequently amended from time to time, applies, shall file with the division of banking, a copy of each report and document that it is required to prepare for or file with one or more federal agencies pursuant to the provisions of that law and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. Each regulated institution, as defined in this chapter, to which the Community Reinvestment Act of 1977, 12 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq., and as subsequently amended from time to time, does not apply, shall file with the division of banking any reports that it may require, but in substantially the same form as the reports required to be filed pursuant to the Community Reinvestment Act by the regulated institutions to which the act applies. Where a regulated institution has filed these reports or documents with the division of banking, an update of the reports or documents shall be required whenever the regulated institution requests the director, or the director’s designee, to take any action on any application to which the provisions of this title apply.

When taking any action on an application made by a regulated institution under this title, the director, or the director’s designee, shall take into account, among other factors, an assessment, in writing, of the record of performance of the regulated institution in helping to meet the credit needs of its entire community, consistent with the safe and sound operation of the regulated institution and an assessment of the economic impact of the matter that is the subject of the application. The assessment and any written communications from the division of banking to a regulated institution relating to the assessment shall be made available to the public upon request. In making the assessment, the director, or the director’s designee, shall review all reports and documents filed with the division of banking pursuant to this section and any signed, written comments received by it or the division of banking that specifically relate to the regulated institution’s performance in helping to meet the credit needs of its community. In addition, the director, or the director’s designee, shall consider the following factors in assessing a regulated institution’s record of performance:

The most recent public Community Reinvestment Act rating by the applicable federal banking regulatory agency;

Any practices intended to discourage application for types of credit set forth in the regulated institution’s Community Reinvestment Act statement(s);

The geographic distribution of the regulated institution’s credit extensions, credit applications, and credit denials;

Evidence of prohibited discriminatory or other illegal credit practices;

The regulated institution’s participation, including investments, in local community development and redevelopment projects or programs;

The regulated institution’s origination of residential mortgage loans, housing rehabilitation loans, home improvement loans, and small business or small farm loans within its community or the purchase of such loans originated in its community;

The regulated institution’s participation in governmental-insured, guaranteed, or subsidized loan programs for housing, small businesses, or small farms;

The effect of the matter that is the subject of the application upon the economy of the neighborhood, city or town, region, or state, including number of and types of jobs and tax base; and

Other factors that, in the judgment of the director, or the director’s designee, reasonably bear upon the extent to which a regulated institution is helping to meet the credit needs and economy of the entire community.

In assessing the record of performance of a regulated institution pursuant to the provision of subsection (b), the director, or the director’s designee, may, where he or she deems it appropriate, if not otherwise required by law, provide for a public hearing when an objection to the regulated institution’s application has been submitted.

An assessment of a regulated institution’s record of performance under subsection (b) may be the basis for denying an application under the provisions of this section.

When taking an action pursuant to subsection (b), the director, or the director’s designee, shall request from the applicant-regulated institution, and from the appropriate federal bank regulatory authorities, any documents other than those required to be filed with the division of banking by this section or by other applicable statutes or regulations.

For the purposes of this section only, and notwithstanding any other provision of this title or any other law to the contrary, the term “regulated institution” shall not include credit unions whose bylaws significantly limit the field of membership, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee.

The director, or the director’s designee, is hereby authorized and empowered to promulgate rules and regulations effectuating the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 8.

19-9-5.
Mortgagor to be offered title insurance.

Every lending institution that accepts an application for a mortgage loan on property located in this state and that engages a title attorney to search the title of the subject real estate shall require the attorney to offer to the prospective mortgagor, at the usual premium rate, an owner’s policy title for the real estate. In the event the prospective mortgagor does not wish to purchase this title insurance, then the prospective mortgagor shall have the right to reject the offer of title insurance, provided the rejection is in writing and signed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-6.
Lending institutions — Title attorney.

Every lending institution that accepts an application for any residential mortgage loan or any commercial mortgage loan and requires that a title attorney search the title of the subject real estate, or requires a policy of title insurance, shall permit the prospective mortgagor to select a qualified title attorney or title insurance company of his, her, or its own choice to search the title of the subject real estate and to furnish title insurance. The lending institution shall not unreasonably disapprove a title insurance policy provided or paid for directly or indirectly by a borrower. The disapproval shall be deemed unreasonable if it is not based solely on reasonable standards uniformly applied, relating only to the extent of coverage required or the financial soundness of an insurer. The standards shall not discriminate against any particular insurer, nor shall the standards call for the disapproval of an insurance policy because the policy contained coverage in addition to that required. Acceptance of a title insurance company’s policy by the Federal National Mortgage Association or the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation shall be conclusive proof that the title insurance company meets the reasonable standards required by this section whether or not the borrower is applying for a residential or a commercial mortgage loan.

In the event the prospective mortgagor does not select a qualified title attorney or title insurance company, the prospective mortgagor shall sign a waiver permitting the lending institution to select an attorney. If any lending institution violates this section, an aggrieved party may file a complaint in the superior court of the county in which the aggrieved party shall dwell or has his, her, or its principal place of business, or Providence county, if the superior court of that county shall not be in session, or if the aggrieved party is a nonresident or has no principal place of business in this state, of any other county as may be agreed upon by the parties to the petition, and serve upon the lending institution a petition for an order of the court for the enforcement of this section, and the petition may request and the court shall have jurisdiction to grant, after notice and hearing, an order:

Granting injunctive relief to restrain the lending institution from engaging in the alleged or suspected violation;

Awarding reasonable attorney’s fees, costs, and expenses of the action; and

Granting any other relief, as may be required, until the person or lending institution complies with the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-7.
Attorney’s opinions.

Except as provided in subsections (b) through (d), no lending institution making a loan in this state, or any attorney, agent, or representative for that lending institution, shall directly or indirectly, as a condition of a loan or advance, require any attorney representing a borrower in the loan transaction to give an opinion in relation to the validity, binding effect, or enforceability of any of the loan documents or the availability of remedies thereunder.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to any transaction in which the state, or any municipality in the state, or any department, agency, authority, or instrumentality of the state is the borrower.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to transactions involving the public sale or underwriting of bonds, debentures, or other securities.

Subsection (a) shall not prohibit, as part of a loan transaction, any requirement or condition with respect to opinions dealing with the authority and status of a borrower and matters relating to collateral.

No opinion obtained in violation of this section may be relied on for any purpose, and this opinion shall not give rise to, or form the basis for, any action against any attorney or firm rendering the opinion. Any lending institution, or attorney, agent, or representative of a lending institution, knowingly violating this section shall be subject to an action as may be lawfully imposed by the regulatory authority or court that has licensing or disciplinary authority over the lending institution, attorney, or other individual in question.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-8.
Lending institutions — Negative amortization loans.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other laws, any person doing business under and as permitted by any law of this state or of the United States relating to lending institutions is authorized, in connection with the making of any loan, to contract for the accrual of interest, at a rate of interest, equal to or less than the note or contractual rate of interest, on unpaid interest accruing during previous billing or payment periods. Accrued and unpaid interest that is thus added to the principal balance of the loan for the purposes of further interest accrual shall, for the purposes of chapter 26 of title 6, be deemed to constitute additional net proceeds or additional principal of the loan, but shall for all other purposes and all other laws constitute interest on the original loan.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-9.
Mortgages issued — Payoffs.

Every lending institution or other entity that owns or services a loan, secured by a mortgage on property located in this state, shall:

Provide to the obligor, within three (3) business days after receipt of a written or telefaxed request, the exact payoff due the lender on the loan;

Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the payoff is requested for a loan that is forty-five (45) days or more delinquent in payment thereof or for any equity line of credit, the payoff shall be provided within five (5) business days of said request. Nothing contained herein shall prevent the institution from providing the exact payoff sooner than the deadline set forth herein;

Notwithstanding the foregoing, nonamortizing loans made by Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation for the purpose of providing closing cost or down-payment assistance shall not be subject to the provisions of this section;

Permit the payoff to be made to it or, in the case of a mortgage owned or serviced by its subsidiary or affiliate or servicing agent, permit the payoff to be made at the subsidiary’s or affiliate’s principal place of business located in this state;

Accept as final interest due the lender on this payoff the interest calculated as of the business day full payment is made to the lending institution or servicing agent; and

Issue or provide to the mortgagor, or his or her agent or real estate closing officer, a discharge of the mortgage securing the loan within thirty (30) days after full payment of the payoff and final interest by separate instrument of release of the mortgage or as provided in §

34-26-3

.

“Payoff statement” means any statement produced by a lending institution or servicer of a mortgage setting forth the amount of the unpaid balance on said mortgage loan, including principal, interest, and other charges assessed pursuant to the loan documentation of such mortgage and a statement of the interest on a per-diem basis with respect to the unpaid principal balance of the mortgage loan.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, if a settlement agent complies with all of the terms of a payoff statement from the lending institution or servicer then the settlement agent shall not be responsible for any shortfall in the amount due to the mortgagee to pay off the mortgage loan in full. The settlement agent shall not be liable for any interest on funds tendered to said lending institution or servicer beyond the date that said funds were received by said lending institution or servicer even if said funds were insufficient to pay off the full balance of the mortgage loan.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47; P.L. 2004, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 403, § 1.

19-9-10.
Disbursement requirements — Purchase money loans — Dwellings.

Any lending institution providing a purchase money first mortgage loan on a property within this state containing less than four (4) living units shall make disbursement of the loan proceeds on or before the date upon which the conveyance and/or mortgage documents are to be recorded. The disbursement shall be in the form of cash, wired funds, government check, cashier’s check, or other immediately available funds. The disbursement shall be made to the agent responsible for settlement. If the disbursement is not as provided in this section, no interest shall be charged for the first thirty (30) days following the closing date.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-11.
Control of deposits by minors.

Every person not under guardianship who may make a deposit personally in any regulated institution may control, transfer, or withdraw the money so deposited, including accruing dividends or interest; notwithstanding, that the person at the time of exercising control or making the transfer or withdrawal, may be a minor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-12.
Trust deposits — Death of trustee.

If a deposit is made with any regulated institution by one person in trust for another, the name and residence of the person for whom it is made shall be disclosed, and it shall be credited to the depositor as trustee for that person. If no other motive of the existence and terms of a trust has been given in writing to the regulated institution, the deposit, with the interest thereon, may, in case of the death of the trustee, be paid to the person for whom the deposit was made or to that person’s legal representative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-13.
Checks of trustees.

When a deposit is made in a regulated institution in the name of two (2) or more persons as trustees, and a check is drawn upon the trust account by any trustee or trustees authorized by the other trustee or trustees to draw checks upon the trust account, neither the payee, nor the other holder, nor the bank is bound to inquire whether it is a breach of trust to authorize the trustee or trustees to draw checks upon the trust account, and the payee, or other holder, or the regulated institution is not liable unless the action of the payee or other holder or the regulated institution amounts to bad faith.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-14.
Deposits payable to survivor.

When a deposit has been or shall be made in any regulated institution in the name of two (2) persons and payable to either or to the survivor, the deposit, or any part of the deposit, or any interest or dividend on the deposit, may be paid to either of those persons, whether the other is living or not, or to the guardian, executor, or administrator of the survivor, and the receipt of the person so paid shall be valid and sufficient release and discharge on account of the payment so made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.

19-9-14.1.
Uniform multiple-person accounts.

Part I. Definitions and General Provisions

Definitions. For purposes of this section the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings, unless the context indicates another meaning:

“Account” means a contract of deposit between a depositor and a depository institution, and includes a checking account, savings account, certificate of deposit, and share account.

“Agent” means a person authorized to make account transactions for a party.

“Beneficiary” means a person named as one to whom sums on deposit in an account are payable on request after death of all parties or for whom a party is named as trustee.

“Devisee” means any person designated in a will to receive a testamentary disposition of real or personal property.

“Depository institution” means an organization authorized to receive deposits and to do business under state or federal laws relating to financial institutions and credit unions, and includes a bank, trust company, savings bank, building and loan association, savings and loan company or association.

“Heirs” means those persons, including a surviving spouse, who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the property of a decedent.

“Multiple-person” or “Multiple-party account” means an account payable on request to one or more parties, whether or not a right of survivorship is mentioned.

“Party” means a person who, by the terms of an account, has a present right, subject to request, to payment from the account other than as a beneficiary or agent.

“Payment” means payment of sums on deposit and includes withdrawal, payment to a party or third person pursuant to check or other request, and a pledge of sums on deposit by a party, or a set-off, reduction, or other disposition of all or part of an account pursuant to a pledge.

“Personal representative” includes executor, administrator, successor, or other court-appointed fiduciary, and persons who perform substantially the same function under the law governing decedent’s estates.

“POD designation” means the designation of: (i) a beneficiary in an account payable on request to one party during his or her lifetime and on his or her death to one or more beneficiaries; or to one or more parties during their lifetimes and on death of all of them to one or more beneficiaries; or (ii) a beneficiary in an account in the name of one or more parties as trustee for one or more beneficiaries if the relationship is established by the terms of the account and there is no trust property other than the sums on deposit in the account, whether or not payment to the beneficiary is mentioned.

“Receive”, as it relates to notice to a depository institution, means receipt in the principal office or branch office of the depository institution in which the account is established, but if the terms of the account require notice at a particular place, in the place required.

“Request” means a request for payment complying with all terms of the account, including special requirements concerning necessary signatures and regulations of the depository institution; but, for purposes of this section, if terms of the account condition payment on advance notice, a request for payment is treated as immediately effective and a notice of intent to withdraw is treated as a request for payment.

“State” includes any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States.

“Successors” means those persons, other than creditors, who are entitled to property of a decedent under the decedent’s will, by intestacy or otherwise.

“Sums on deposit” means the balance payable on an account, including interest and dividends earned, whether or not included in the current balance, and any deposit life insurance proceeds added to the account by reason of death of a party.

“Terms of the account” includes the deposit agreement and other terms and conditions, including the form, of the contract of deposit.

Scope. This section applies to accounts in this state. This section does not apply to:

An account established for a partnership, joint venture, or other organization for a business purpose;

An account controlled by one or more persons as an agent or trustee for a corporation, unincorporated association, or charitable or civic organization; or

A fiduciary or trust account in which the relationship is established other than by the terms of the account.

Types of accounts — Existing accounts.

An account may be for a single party or multiple parties. A multiple-party account may be with or without a right of survivorship between the parties. Subject to subsection (h)(3), either a single-party account or a multiple-party account may have a POD designation.

An account established before, on, or after the effective date of this section [July 5, 2008], whether in the form prescribed in subsection (d) or in any other form, is either a single-party account or a multiple-party account, with or without right of survivorship, and with or without a POD designation, within the meaning of this section is governed by this subsection.

Forms.

A contract of deposit that contains provisions in substantially the following form establishes the type of account provided; and the account is governed by the provisions of this section applicable to an account of that type:

A contract of deposit that does not contain provisions in substantially the form provided in subsection (d)(1) is governed by the provisions of this section applicable to the type of account that most nearly conforms to the depositor’s intent.

Designation of agent.

By a writing signed by all parties, the parties may designate another person as agent of all parties on an account.

Unless the terms of an agency designation provide that the agent’s authority terminates on disability or incapacity of a party, the agent’s authority survives such disability or incapacity. The agent may act for a disabled or incapacitated party until the authority of the agent is terminated.

Death of the sole party or last surviving party terminates the authority of an agent.

Applicability of Parts. The provisions of Part II concerning beneficial ownership as between parties or as between parties and beneficiaries apply only to controversies between those persons and their creditors and other successors, and do not apply to the right of those persons to payment as determined by the terms of the account. Part III governs the liability and set-off rights of depository institutions that make payments pursuant to it.

Part II. Ownership as Between Parties and Others

Ownership during lifetime.

In this subsection, “net contribution” of a party means the sum of all deposits to an account made by or for the party, less all payments from the account made to or for the party that have not been paid to or applied to the use of another party and a proportionate share of any charges deducted from the account, plus a proportionate share of any interest or dividends earned, whether or not included in the current balance. The term includes any deposit life insurance proceeds added to the account by reason of death of the party whose net contribution is in question.

During the lifetime of all parties, an account belongs to the parties in proportion to the net contribution of each to the sums on deposit, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent. As between parties married to each other, in the absence of proof otherwise, the net contribution of each is presumed to be an equal amount.

A beneficiary in an account having a POD designation has no right to sums on deposit during the lifetime of any party.

Rights at death.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, on death of a party sums on deposit in a multiple-party account belong to the surviving party or parties. If two (2) or more parties survive and one is the surviving spouse of the decedent, the amount to which the decedent, immediately before death, was beneficially entitled under subsection (g) belongs to the surviving spouse. If two (2) or more parties survive and none is the surviving spouse of the decedent, the amount to which the decedent, immediately before death, was beneficially entitled under subsection (g) belongs to the surviving parties in equal shares, and augments the proportion to which each survivor, immediately before the decedent’s death, was beneficially entitled under subsection (g), and the right of survivorship continues between the surviving parties.

In an account with a POD designation:

On death of one of two (2) or more parties, the rights in sums on deposit are governed by subsection (h)(1).

On death of the sole party or the last survivor of two (2) or more parties, sums on deposit belong to the surviving beneficiary or beneficiaries. If two (2) or more beneficiaries survive, sums on deposit belong to them in equal and undivided shares, and there is no right of survivorship in the event of death of a beneficiary thereafter. If no beneficiary survives, sums on deposit belong to the estate of the last surviving party.

Sums on deposit in a single-party account without a POD designation, or in a multiple-party account that, by the terms of the account, is without right of survivorship, are not affected by death of a party, but the amount of which the decedent, immediately before death, was beneficially entitled under subsection (g) herein is transferred as part of the decedent’s estate. A POD designation in a multiple-party account without right of survivorship is ineffective. For purposes of this section, designation of an account as a tenancy in common establishes that the account is without right of survivorship.

The ownership right of a surviving party or beneficiary, or of the decedent’s estate, in sums on deposit is subject to requests for payment made by a party before the party’s death, whether paid by the depository institution before or after death, or unpaid. The surviving party or beneficiary, or the decedent’s estate, is liable to the payee of an unpaid request for payment. The liability is limited to a proportionate share of the amount transferred under this section, to the extent necessary to discharge the request for payment.

Alteration of rights. Rights at death of a party under subsection (h) are determined by the terms of the account at the death of the party. A party may alter the terms of the account by a notice signed by the party and given to the depository institution to change the terms of the account or to stop or vary payment under the terms of the account. To be effective, the notice must be received by the financial institution during the party’s lifetime. A right of survivorship, arising from the express terms of the account, subsection (h), or a POD designation, may not be altered by will.

Accounts and transfers nontestamentary. A transfer resulting from the application of subsection (h) is effective by reason of the terms of the account involved and this section and is not testamentary or subject to estate administration.

Part III. Protection of Depository Institutions

Authority of depository institution. A depository institution may enter into a contract of deposit for a multiple-party account to the same extent it may enter into a contract of deposit for a single-party account, and may provide for a POD designation in either a single-party account or a multiple-party account. A depository institution need not inquire as to the source of a deposit to an account or as to the proposed application of a payment from an account.

Payment on multiple-party account. A depository institution, on request, may pay sums on deposit in a multiple-party account to:

One or more of the parties, whether or not another party is disabled, incapacitated, or deceased when payment is requested and whether or not the party making the request survives another party; or

The personal representative, if any, or, if there is none, the heirs or devisees of a deceased party if proof of death is presented to the depository institution showing that the deceased party was the survivor of all other persons named on the account either as a party or beneficiary, unless the account is without right of survivorship under subsection (h).

Payment on POD designation. A depository institution, on request, may pay sums on deposit in an account with a POD designation to:

One or more of the parties, whether or not another party is disabled, incapacitated, or deceased when the payment is requested and whether or not a party survives another party;

The beneficiary or beneficiaries, if proof of death is presented to the depository institution showing that the beneficiary or beneficiaries survived all persons named as parties; or

The personal representative, if any, or, if there is none, the heirs or devisees of a deceased party, if proof of death is presented to the depository institution showing that the deceased party was the survivor of all other persons named on the account either as a party or beneficiary.

Payment to designated agent. A depository institution, on request of an agent under a power of attorney or other agency designation for an account, may pay to the agent sums on deposit in the account, whether or not a party is disabled, incapacitated, or deceased when the request is made or received, and whether or not the authority of the agent terminates on the disability or incapacity of a party.

Payment to minor. If a depository institution is required or permitted to make payment pursuant to this chapter to a minor designated as a beneficiary, payment may be made pursuant to the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

Discharge.

Payment made pursuant to this section in accordance with the terms of the account discharges the depository institution from all claims for amounts so paid, whether or not the payment is consistent with the beneficial ownership of the account as between parties, beneficiaries, or their successors. Payment may be made whether or not a party, beneficiary, or agent is disabled, incapacitated, or deceased when payment is requested, received, or made.

Protection under this section does not extend to payments made after a depository institution has received written notice from a party, or from the personal representative, surviving spouse, or heir or devisee of a deceased party, to the effect that payments in accordance with the terms of the account, including one having an agency designation, should not be permitted, and the depository institution has had a reasonable opportunity to act on it when the payment is made. Unless the notice is withdrawn by the person giving it, the successor of any deceased party must concur in request for payment if the depository institution is to be protected under this section. Unless a depository institution has been served with process in an action or proceeding, no other notice or other information shown to have been available to the depository institution affects its right to protection under this section.

A depository institution that receives written notice pursuant to this section or otherwise has reason to believe that a dispute exists as to the rights of the parties may refuse, without liability, to make payments in accordance with the terms of the account.

Protection of a depository institution under this section does not affect the rights of parties in disputes between themselves or their successors concerning the beneficial ownership of sums on deposit in accounts or payments made from accounts.

Set-off. Without qualifying any other statutory right to set-off or lien and subject to any contractual provision, if a party is indebted to a depository institution, the institution has a right to set-off against the account. The amount of the account subject to set-off is the proportion to which the party is, or immediately before death was, beneficially entitled under subsection (g) or, in the absence of proof of that proportion, an equal share with all parties.

UNIFORM SINGLE- OR MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNT FORM PARTIES [Name One or More Parties]: OWNERSHIP [Select One And Initial]: SINGLE-PARTY ACCOUNT — Party’s own account MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNT — Parties’ own account in proportion to net contributions unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent. RIGHTS AT DEATH [Select One And Initial]: SINGLE-PARTY ACCOUNT — At death of party, ownership passes as part of party’s estate. SINGLE-PARTY ACCOUNT WITH POD (PAY ON DEATH) DESIGNATION — At death of party, ownership passes to POD beneficiary or beneficiaries, equally, and is not part of party’s estate. [Name One Or More Beneficiaries]: MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNT WITH RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP — At death of party, ownership passes to surviving party or parties. MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNT WITH RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP AND POD (PAY ON DEATH) DESIGNATION — At death of last surviving party, ownership passes to POD beneficiary or beneficiaries, equally, and is not part of last surviving party’s estate. [Name One Or More Beneficiaries]: MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNT WITHOUT RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP — At death of party, deceased party’s ownership passes as part of deceased party’s estate.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 295, § 1.

19-9-15.
Pledge of passbook accounts.

Any deposit evidenced by a passbook in a regulated institution may be pledged by delivery of the passbook to the pledgee, with an order for its transfer; but this pledge shall not be effective to secure the deposit against any person other than the pledgor or his or her executor or administrator, unless an actual transfer of the deposit has been made upon the books of the regulated institution or the order for the transfer has been disclosed to, and a copy filed with, the regulated institution holding the deposit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 47.